Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2078.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1793(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1793. Special provisions relating to premiums.(a) Limitation on premium increases.--* * *(3) An insurer shall not increase the premium rate of an owner of a policy of insurance subject to this chapter by more than 5% annually for an insured who has not been convicted of a violation of an offense enumerated in section 1535.* * *Section 2. The addition of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1793(a)(3) shall apply to private passenger automobile insurance policies 123456789101112131415161718 offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB2078PN2666 - 2 - 123